Utah statutes.
31A-28-102.   Purpose.
(1)  The purpose of this part is to protect, subject to certain limitations,
the persons specified in Subsection 31A-28-103(1) against failure in the
performance of contractual obligations, under a life and accident and health
insurance policy or annuity contract specified in Subsection 31A-28-103(2),
because of the impairment or insolvency of the member insurer that issued the
policy or contract.
(2)  To provide the protection described in Subsection (1):
(a)  the Utah Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association, which currently
exists, is continued to pay benefits and to continue coverages as limited by
this part; and
(b)  members of the association are subject to assessment to provide funds to
carry out the purpose of this part.
